District of Columbia statutes.
10-206

Officers; rules and regulations.

The Board shall select from among its citizen membership its Chairman and its Secretary and is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt all necessary rules and regulations for the conduct of its business.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 262, ch. 265, art. I, § 5
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.
1973 Ed., § 8-206.
1981 Ed., § 8-206.